Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 25 Future Loans and After-Acquired Property

34-25-1.
Real estate mortgage to secure future loans — Amounts and purposes of loans covered.

Whenever a mortgage deed in statutory form or other form mortgaging real property is entitled at the beginning thereof “Mortgage to secure present and future loans under §§

34-25-1

—

34-25-5

” and contains in its provisions a provision to the effect that it is intended to secure present and future loans and states a maximum amount as the total of the principal amount of loans to be secured thereby, hereinafter referred to as the stated maximum amount, the mortgage deed shall be security from the time of its recording in the records for recording real estate mortgages in the city or town in which the real property mortgaged therein is located for all loans which at the time of or before the recordings are made or agreed to be made by the mortgagee to the mortgagor on the security of the mortgage and shall also constitute security from the time of its recording for all additional loans made from time to time by the mortgagee to the mortgagor on the security of the mortgage after the recording of the mortgage and prior to its discharge of record, whether or not made after reduction of the principal of any loan made on the security of the mortgage. The mortgage shall also be security for interest, taxes, insurance premiums and other obligations undertaken by such mortgagor in the mortgage deed or in the note or notes secured thereby, notwithstanding that the interest, taxes, insurance premiums and other obligations, when added to the total principal amount of the loans outstanding at any time, may cause the amount secured by the mortgage to exceed the stated maximum amount.

Provided, however, that such stated maximum amount shall not be an amount which exceeds by more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) the total of the principal amount of loans which at the time of or before the recording the mortgagee made or agreed to make to the mortgagor.

And provided further, that that portion of the total amount of the principal of all loans outstanding at any one time made on the security of the mortgage in excess of the stated maximum amount shall not, to the extent of such excess, be secured by the mortgage while the total amount outstanding is in excess of the stated maximum amount.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 20; P.L. 1952, ch. 3018, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-25-1

.

34-25-2.
Priority of future loan mortgages over encumbrances not previously recorded.

The mortgage and the rights established therein shall, to the extent of the loans secured thereby, and interest, taxes, insurance premiums, and other obligations secured thereby, have full priority over all mortgages, liens and encumbrances which have not been recorded prior to such recording of the mortgage deed except as otherwise hereinafter provided.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 20; P.L. 1952, ch. 3018, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-25-2

.

34-25-3.
Priority of attachment, execution, or lis pendens over subsequent loans.

If, after the recording of the mortgage, any writ of attachment attaching the real estate mortgaged under the mortgage or any execution against the real estate or any notice of lis pendens affecting the real estate is recorded in the records of the city or town, loans on the security of the mortgage, made after the attachment, execution or lis pendens becomes so of record, shall not have priority over the attachment, execution or notice of lis pendens, except that loans which the mortgagee at or before the recording of the mortgage made or agreed with the mortgagor to make on the security of the mortgage and additional loans made on the security of the mortgage pursuant to the provisions of §§

34-25-1

—

34-25-5

prior to such recording of the attachment, execution or lis pendens, together with interest thereon, and the taxes, insurance premiums and obligations of the mortgagor as the mortgagee has agreed, or which the mortgagor has given the mortgagee the right, to pay in connection with the mortgage, shall continue to have priority over the attachment, execution or lis pendens.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 20; P.L. 1952, ch. 3018, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-25-3

.

34-25-4.
Relinquishment of security as to additional loans — Stipulation as to amount due.

If the mortgagor shall desire that the privilege shall be terminated of having the mortgage constitute security for further loans in addition to the loans which the mortgagee at or before the recording of the mortgage made or agreed with the mortgagor to make on the security of the mortgage, and shall desire that the principal amount of loans made or agreed upon prior to the recording on the security of the mortgage and loans made after the recording shall be established as a matter of record, and if the mortgagor shall in writing by registered or certified mail notify the mortgagee of such desire. The mortgagee shall execute and deliver to the mortgagor at the address within this state specified in the notice a stipulation in writing setting forth the principal amount of loans made or agreed to be made on the security of the mortgage prior to the time of the receipt of the notice and relinquishing the right to have the mortgage constitute security for additional loans made to the mortgagor subsequent to the receipt of the written notice except loans which the mortgagee prior to receipt of the notice agreed to make to the mortgagor. The mortgagor shall offer the stipulation for record in the records of land evidence with payment for the recording thereof, and the recorder of deeds shall record the stipulation when so offered and shall cause reference thereto to be made on the original recording of the mortgage. The recording fee for recording any such stipulation shall not exceed four dollars ($4.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 20; P.L. 1952, ch. 3018, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-25-4

; P.L. 1986, ch. 331, § 2.

34-25-5.
Mortgages to which §§ 34-25-1 — 34-25-5 apply.

“Mortgage,” as used in §§

34-25-1

—

34-25-5

, means a real estate, mortgage deed or real estate mortgage instrument entitled “Mortgage to secure present and future loans under §§

34-25-1

—

34-25-5

,” and which includes in its provisions the aforesaid provision to the effect that it is intended to secure present and future loans and which states a maximum amount as the total of the amount of loans to be secured thereby; but §§ 34-25-1 to

34-25-6

shall not apply to nor affect, directly, indirectly or by implication, any mortgage made before April 29, 1952, and shall not apply to nor affect, directly, indirectly, or by implication, any mortgage thereafter made, whether or not it provides for future loans, unless it contains the provisions required in § 34-25-1 and is also entitled at the beginning thereof “Mortgage to secure present and future loans under §§ 34-25-1 to 34-25-5.”

“Mortgagor,” as used in §§

34-25-1

—

34-25-5

, means and includes wherever applicable the mortgagor and mortgagors named in the “mortgage,” his, her, its or their heirs, executors, administrators, successors or assigns.

“Mortgagee,” as used in §§

34-25-1

—

34-25-5

, means and includes wherever applicable the mortgagee and mortgagees named in the “mortgage,” his, her, its or their executors, administrators, successors or assigns.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 20; P.L. 1952, ch. 3018, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-25-5

.

34-25-6.
Mortgagees authorized to take future loan mortgages.

Domestic building-loan associations, whether organized by special act of the general assembly or pursuant to the provisions of chapter 22 of title 19, foreign building-loan associations subject to the provisions of chapter 24 of title 19, savings and loan associations organized under the laws of the United States of America, credit unions subject to the provisions of chapter 21 of title 19, and other financial institutions are expressly authorized to make loans secured by mortgages entitled as provided in §

34-25-1

and containing the provision required in §

34-25-1

to be contained in the provisions of such mortgages, provided that such loans comply in other respects with the requirements of law relating to loans secured by real estate mortgages made by such institutions.

Other mortgagees are authorized to make loans on the security of such mortgages if such mortgages comply with the requirements of §§

34-25-1

—

34-25-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3018, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-25-6

.

34-25-7.
Application of mortgages to after-acquired property of public utilities.

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 9 of title 6A, whenever any public utility, as defined in chapter 1 of title 39, shall have given a mortgage expressly including real or personal property to be acquired after the date of the execution of the mortgage, and the mortgage shall have been duly recorded, no further deed, conveyance or recording, or delivery of possession from the mortgagor to the mortgagee, his, her, or its heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns shall be required as to any real or personal property situated in any town or city in which the mortgage shall have been duly recorded, if real property, or the office of the secretary of state, if personal property, and all right, title and interest of the public utility in and to any real or personal property situated in any town or city in which the mortgage shall have been duly recorded, if real property, or the office of the secretary of state, if personal property, and acquired by the mortgagor after the execution and prior to the discharge of the mortgage, unless otherwise expressly provided in the mortgage, shall vest in the mortgagee, his, her, or its heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns, subject to the terms of the mortgage, as against all persons whatsoever, immediately upon the acquisition of the real or personal property by the mortgagor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 302, § 19; P.L. 1929, ch. 1367, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

34-25-7

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

34-25-8.
Open-end mortgages.

Whenever a mortgage deed in statutory form or other form mortgaging real property is clearly entitled at the beginning thereof “Open-end mortgage to secure present and future loans under chapter 25 of title 34” and in all other respects complies with the requirements of §

34-25-9

, the mortgage deed shall be security from the time of its recording in the records for recording real estate mortgages in the city or town in which the real property mortgaged therein is located for all mortgage debt secured thereby at the time of recording and for all future advances secured thereby in an aggregate principal amount outstanding at any time not to exceed the stated amount of such mortgage deed, whether or not the future advances are agreed to be made at the time of recording such mortgage deed and whether or not the mortgages readvances principal sums repaid. The mortgage shall also be security for interest, taxes, insurance premiums and such other obligations as are undertaken by the mortgagor in the mortgage deed or in the note or notes or agreement secured thereby, notwithstanding that the interest, taxes, insurance premiums and other obligations, when added to the total principal amount of such loans outstanding at any time may cause the amount secured by the mortgage deed to exceed the stated maximum amount. The application of this section shall be retroactive to June 1, 1983.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 238, § 1.

34-25-9.
Form of open-end mortgage.

In order to be entitled to the benefits of this chapter, a mortgage deed shall comply with the following provisions:

The mortgage deed shall contain specific provisions permitting the future advances;

At no time shall the unpaid principal balance of indebtedness outstanding under the mortgage deed exceed the stated amount thereof;

All future advances shall be evidenced by a note or notes and/or an agreement signed by the obligor whose indebtedness is secured by the mortgage deed;

The original mortgage deed shall be executed and recorded on or after June 1, 1983; and

The mortgage shall provide an address at which mortgagee will accept written notices pursuant to §§

34-25-10(b)

and

34-25-11

. The application of this section shall be retroactive to June 1, 1983.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 238, § 1.

34-25-10.
Priority of open-end mortgages over encumbrances not previously recorded.

The mortgage deed and the rights established therein, shall, to the extent of the loans secured thereby, and interest, taxes, insurance premiums and other obligations as secured thereby, have full priority over all mortgages, liens and encumbrances which have not been recorded prior to the recording of the mortgage deed except as otherwise hereinafter provided.

If, after the recording of the mortgage deed, any writ of attachment attaching the real estate mortgaged under the mortgage deed or any execution against the real estate or any notice of lis pendens affecting the real estate or any subsequent mortgage or lien against such real estate be recorded in the records of the city or town, any optional or nonobligatory advances secured by the mortgage deed which are made by the mortgagee after receipt of written notice by the mortgagee at the address provided for such purpose in the mortgage deed, shall not have priority over the lien of the writ of attachment, execution, lis pendens or subsequent mortgage or lien, except that any obligatory advances which the mortgagee agreed to make by agreement entered into with mortgagor prior to receipt of written notice and any taxes, insurance premiums and obligations of the mortgagor as the mortgagee has agreed, or which the mortgagor has given the mortgagee the right, to pay in connection with the mortgage deed, shall continue to have priority over the writ of attachment, execution, lis pendens, or subsequent mortgage or lien. For the purposes of this chapter, an “obligator advance” is defined as any advance or principal which the mortgagee is obligated to make, absent the occurrence of an event of default under the mortgage or any corresponding loan agreement or notes, on or before a specified date or time or upon application therefor by the mortgagor or other obligor whose indebtedness is secured by the mortgage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 230, § 1.

34-25-11.
Relinquishment of security as to additional future advances — Stipulation as to amount due.

If the mortgagor desires to terminate the privilege of having the mortgage constitute security for further future advances in addition to all advances theretofore made by the mortgagee on the security of the mortgage, and desires to establish the then principal amount of loans outstanding and made on the security of the mortgage as a matter of record, the mortgagor shall, in writing, by registered or certified mail, send to the mortgagee at the address provided for such purpose in the mortgage, notice of the desire, then the mortgagee shall execute and deliver to the mortgagor at the address within this state specified in the notice, a stipulation, in writing, setting forth the then unpaid principal amount of loans outstanding and made on the security of the mortgage prior to the time of the receipt of the notice and relinquishing the right to have the mortgage constitute security for additional future advances made to the mortgagor subsequent to the receipt of written notice. The mortgagor shall offer the stipulation for record in the records of land evidence with payment for the recording thereof, and the recorder of deeds shall record the stipulation when so offered and shall cause reference thereto to be made on the original recording of the mortgage. The recording fee for recording any stipulation shall not exceed ten dollars ($10.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 230, § 1.

34-25-12.
Discharge of open-end mortgage.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

34-26-2

, no mortgagee under an open-end mortgage subject to this chapter shall be obligated to discharge the mortgage until the mortgagee receives full satisfaction for the money due thereon and receives such written agreements as the mortgagee shall reasonably request releasing the mortgagee from any further obligation to make future advances under any and all notes and agreements theretofore secured by the mortgage deed.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any agreement by and between the mortgagee and the mortgagor or any other person, the mortgagee under the mortgage shall have the option to discharge any mortgage if there has existed no outstanding indebtedness thereunder for a continuous period of not less than two (2) years, and effective upon the recording of the discharge, the mortgagee shall be released and discharged from any further obligation to make any loans or advances under any notes or agreements executed in connection with the mortgage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 230, § 1.

34-25-13.
Mortgages to which §§ 34-25-8 — 34-25-14 apply.

“Mortgage,” as used in §§

34-25-8

—

34-25-14

, means a real estate mortgage deed or real estate mortgage instrument entitled, “Open-end mortgage to secure present and future loans under chapter 25 of title 34”, and which includes in its provisions the terms and elements set forth in §

34-25-9

; but this chapter shall not apply to nor affect, directly, indirectly or by implication, any mortgage made before June 1, 1983, and shall not apply to nor affect, directly, indirectly, or by implication, any mortgage thereafter made, whether or not it provides for future loans, unless it complies with the requirements of this chapter.

“Mortgagor”, as used in §§

34-25-8

—

34-25-14

, means and includes the mortgagor and mortgagors named in the “mortgage,” and his, her, its or their heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns, as the case may be.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 230, § 1.

34-25-14.
Mortgagees authorized to take open-end mortgages.

Domestic building-loan associations, whether organized by special act of the general assembly or pursuant to the provisions of chapter 22 of title 19, foreign building-loan associations subject to the provisions of chapter 24 of title 19, savings and loan associations organized under the laws of the United States, credit unions subject to the provisions of chapter 21 of title 19, loan and investment banks subject to the provisions of chapter 20 of title 19 and other financial institutions are expressly authorized to make loans secured by mortgages entitled as provided in §

34-25-8

and containing the provisions required in §§

34-25-8

and

34-25-9

to be contained in the provisions of such mortgages; provided, that such loans comply in other respects with the requirements of law, if any, relating to loans secured by real estate mortgages made by those institutions.

Other mortgagees are authorized to make loans on the security of such mortgages if such mortgages comply with the requirements of §§

34-25-8

—

34-25-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 230, § 1.